South Dakota, session 2026, SB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 24-5-3 be AMENDED:
24-5-3. Upon discharge of an inmate from a correctional facility, whether by
parole, suspended sentence, or final discharge, a correctional facility official must provide
the inmate with the following, if not already provided:
(1) Suitable clothing;
(2) A sum of money to be determined by the secretary of corrections; and
(3) Transportation to one of the following locations:
(a) The county where the inmate resided at the time of the offense that resulted
in imprisonment;
(b) The county where the inmate received sentence; or
(c) A location equivalent in distance to either subsection (a) or (b), whichever
is lesser in mileage.

26.152.11 2 139
An Act to revise a provision related to the transportation of an inmate upon discharge from a
correctional facility.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 139
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 139 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB139 ENROLLED